Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 59 Council on Postsecondary Education
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-59-1.
Council on Postsecondary Education established.

There is created a council on postsecondary education, sometimes referred to as the “council,” which shall be and is constituted a public corporation, empowered to sue and be sued in its own name, and to exercise all the powers, in addition to those specifically enumerated in this chapter, usually appertaining to public corporations entrusted with control of postsecondary educational institutions and functions. Upon its organization, the council shall be invested with the legal title (in trust for the state) to all property, real and personal, now owned by and/or under the control or in custody of the board of regents for education for the use of Rhode Island college, the community college of Rhode Island and the system of community colleges of Rhode Island, including all departments, divisions, and branches of these.

The council is empowered to hold and operate the property in trust for the state; to acquire, hold, and dispose of the property and other like property as deemed necessary for the execution of its corporate purposes. The council is made successor to all powers, rights, duties, and privileges formerly belonging to the board of regents for education pertaining to postsecondary education and the board of governors for higher education.

The council shall be the employer of record for Rhode Island college and the community college of Rhode Island and the office of postsecondary education. It shall retain all authority formerly vested in the board of education regarding the employment of faculty and staff at Rhode Island college and the community college of Rhode Island.

The council shall be the governing body for the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance and shall retain all authority formerly vested in the higher education assistance authority board of directors pursuant to §

16-57-7

; however, any debts, liabilities, or obligations of the council that result from its status as such governing body shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of reserve funds set forth and established by the prior Rhode Island higher education assistance authority and/or the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance created pursuant to chapter 57 of this title, and not from any assets or property held by the council on public higher education pursuant to this chapter.

The council on postsecondary education shall be the employer of record for the division of higher education assistance.

The council on postsecondary education, simultaneous with the transfer of authority to the university of Rhode Island board of trustees pursuant to §

16-32-2

, shall enter into a sublease with the university of Rhode Island board of trustees for the space the university currently occupies at the Rhode Island nursing education center in Providence, Rhode Island, such sublease being coterminous with the lease and incorporating the same terms, conditions and space allocations currently in effect under the lease, and P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 4, § 8, and that certain memorandum of understanding dated January 7, 2017, among the Rhode Island office of postsecondary commissioner, the university of Rhode Island and Rhode Island college.

The council is empowered to enter into contracts and agreements with the board of trustees for the university of Rhode Island and/or the department of administration related to public higher education employee benefits, including, but not limited to, retirement benefits, health, dental, vision and life insurance, disability insurance, workers’ compensation, and tuition waivers to maximize the state’s and council’s purchasing and investment portfolio and educational opportunities for the benefit of its employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 596, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 17; P.L. 2006, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 5; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 7; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 6.

16-59-2.
Appointment of members of the council on postsecondary education.

The governor shall establish the council for postsecondary education by appointing eight (8) members of the board of education established pursuant to chapter 97 of this title to serve as members of the council, until the expiration of their term as a member of the board of education and their successor is appointed. In addition the governor shall appoint one (1) student member who shall be a full time student in good standing at the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College or the Community College of Rhode Island and who shall serve in a non-voting, ex-officio capacity for a single two (2) year term and shall rotate among the three (3) public institutions. The governor shall appoint the chair of the council on an annual basis from among the eight (8) voting council members. The chair of the board of education shall serve on the council in voting, ex-officio capacity. Five (5) voting members of the council shall constitute a quorum and the vote of a majority of those present and voting shall be required for action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 596, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 526, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 54; P.L. 2006, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 5.

16-59-3.
Removal of public members of board.

Public members of the board of governors shall be removable by the governor for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful. No removal shall be made for any cause except after ten (10) days’ notice in writing of specific charges, with opportunity for the member to be present in person and with counsel at a public hearing before the governor, to introduce witnesses and documentary evidence in his or her own defense, and to confront and cross-examine adversary witnesses; and appeal shall lie to the superior court from the governor’s determination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3.

16-59-4.
Powers and duties of the council on postsecondary education.

The council on postsecondary education shall have, in addition to those enumerated in §

16-59-1

, the following powers and duties:

To approve a systematic program of information gathering, processing, and analysis addressed to every level, aspect, and form of higher education in this state especially as that information relates to current and future educational needs so that current needs may be met with reasonable promptness and plans formulated to meet future needs as they arise in the most efficient and economical manner possible.

To develop and approve a strategic plan implementing broad goals and objectives for higher education in the state as established by the board of education, including a comprehensive capital development program.

To formulate broad policy to implement the goals and objectives established and adopted by the board of education; to adopt standards and require enforcement; and to exercise general supervision over all higher public education in the state and over independent higher education in the state as provided in subsections (8) and (9) of this section. The board of education and the council shall not engage in the operation or administration of any subordinate committee, university, junior college, or community college, except its own office of postsecondary education and except as specifically authorized by an act of the general assembly; provided, the presidents of each institution of higher learning shall be the chief administrative and executive officers of that institution; and provided that nothing contained in this section shall prohibit their direct access to or interfere with the relationship between the presidents and the board of education and the council.

To communicate with and seek the advice of the commissioner of postsecondary education, the presidents of the public higher education institutions, and all those concerned with, and affected by, its determinations as a regular procedure in arriving at its conclusions and in setting its policy.

To prepare and maintain a five-year (5) funding plan for higher education that implements the strategic financing recommendations of the board of education; to prepare, with the assistance of the commissioner of postsecondary education, and to present annually to the state budget officer, in accordance with §

35-3-4

, a state higher education budget, which shall include, but not be limited to, the budget of the office of postsecondary education and the budget of the state colleges. In the preparation of the budget, the council shall implement priorities established by the board of education of expenditures for public higher education purposes of state revenues and other public resources made available for the support of higher public education. Prior to submitting the budget to the state budget officer as required by the budget office instructions and this subsection, the council shall present the budget to the board of education for its review and approval. Nothing contained in this subdivision shall authorize the council to alter the allocation of grants or aid otherwise provided by law.

To maintain an office of postsecondary commissioner; to provide for its staffing and organization; and to manage and oversee a commissioner of postsecondary education pursuant to duties and responsibilities defined in §§

16-59-6

and

16-59-7

[repealed]. The commissioner of postsecondary education and the office of postsecondary commissioner shall have the duties and responsibilities as defined in §§

16-59-6

and

16-59-7

[repealed].

To appoint and dismiss presidents of the public institutions of higher learning with the assistance of the commissioner of postsecondary education, and to establish procedures for this, and with the assistance of the commissioner to approve or disapprove vice presidents of the public institutions of higher learning appointed by the respective presidents of the public institutions of higher learning.

To establish other educational agencies or subcommittees necessary or desirable for the conduct of any or all aspects of higher education and to determine all powers, functions, and composition of any agencies or subcommittees and to dissolve them when their purpose shall have been fulfilled.

To exercise the authority vested in the board of regents for education with relation to independent higher educational institutions within the state under the terms of chapter 40 of this title, and other laws affecting independent higher education in the state.

To enforce the provisions of all laws relating to higher education, public and independent.

To be responsible for all the functions, powers, and duties that were vested in the board of regents for education relating to higher education, including, but not limited to, the following specific functions:

To approve the role and scope of programs at public institutions of higher learning with the assistance of the commissioner of postsecondary education which shall include, but not be limited to, populations to be served, the type and level of programs, and academic fields offered.

To adopt and require standard accounting procedures for the office of postsecondary commissioner and all public colleges and universities.

To approve a clear and definitive mission for each public institution of higher learning with the assistance of the commissioner of postsecondary education that is consistent with the role and scope of programs at the public institutions.

To promote maximum efficiency, economy, and cooperation in the delivery of public higher educational services in the state and cooperation with independent institutions of higher education.

To incorporate into its own affirmative action reporting process periodic reports monitoring specific faculty and staff searches by the chairperson of the search committee to include the rationale for granting those interviews and the final hiring results. The institutions must empower their affirmative action officer to monitor searches in this manner; to intervene during the search; and, when necessary, to cause a search to cease if affirmative action goals are not being adequately served.

To incorporate a specific category for accountability on affirmative action goals and implementation as part of the board’s annual evaluations and three-year (3) reviews for the presidents of each of the public institutions of higher education.

To make a formal request of the governor that, whenever an opportunity arises to make new appointments to the board, that the governor make every effort to increase the number of African Americans, Native Americans, Asians, and Hispanics on the board.

To develop coherent plans for the elimination of unnecessary duplication in public higher education and addressing the future needs of public education within the state in the most efficient and economical manner possible.

To delegate to the presidents of each public higher education institution the authority and responsibility for operational and management decisions related to their institutions, consistent with the goals of the statewide strategic plan for postsecondary education; provided, however, that the presidents may be required to provide information or updates to the council regarding any delegated operational or management decisions.

To approve application and renewal fees for all postsecondary institutions situated in Rhode Island, public or private, that choose to participate in an interstate, postsecondary distance-education reciprocity agreement.

To the extent necessary for participation, and to the extent required and stated in an interstate distance-learning reciprocity agreement, the council shall promulgate procedures to address complaints received from out-of-state students in connection with, or related to, any Rhode Island postsecondary institution, public or private, that has been approved to participate in an interstate distance-learning reciprocity agreement.

To serve as the governing body of the division of higher education assistance and exercise all powers and duties of the division of higher education assistance as set forth under the terms of Chapter 57 of this title; however, any debts, liabilities, or obligations of the council that result from its status as such governing body shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of reserve funds set forth and established by the prior Rhode Island higher education assistance authority and/or the Rhode Island division of higher education assistance created pursuant to Chapter 57 of this title, and not from any assets or property held by the council on postsecondary education pursuant to this chapter.

To guarantee one hundred percent (100%) of the unpaid principal and accrued interest of any eligible loan made by a lender to any eligible borrower in existence prior to July 1, 2015, for the purpose of assisting the students in obtaining an education in an eligible institution, subject, however, to the limitation regarding any debts, liabilities, or obligations of the council set forth in subsection (19) above, and in §

16-57-12

.

To prescribe rules and regulations deemed necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of serving as a guaranty agency for the loans set forth in subsection (20) of this section, including without limitation rules and regulations:

To ensure compliance by the division with the requirements imposed by statutes or regulation governing the guaranty, insurance, purchase, or other dealing in eligible loans by federal agencies, instrumentalities, or corporations;

To set standards of eligibility for educational institutions, students, and lenders and to define residency and all other terms as the division deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and

To set standards for the administration of programs of postsecondary student financial assistance assigned by law to the division, including but not limited to savings programs. Administrative rules governing savings programs shall authorize the division, in conjunction with the commissioner of postsecondary education, to negotiate reciprocal agreements with institutions in other states offering similar savings programs for the purpose of maximizing educational benefits to students in this state.

To establish penalties for violations of any order, rule, or regulation of the division, and a method for enforcing these.

To set and collect fees and charges, in connection with its guaranties and servicing, including without limitation reimbursement of costs of financing by the division, service charges, and insurance premiums and fees and costs associated with implementing and administering savings programs established pursuant to this chapter.

To hold and operate property previously held by the higher education assistance authority in trust for the state, and to acquire, hold, and dispose of the property and other like property as deemed necessary for the execution of its corporate purposes.

To direct the public colleges of higher education to adopt and, upon approval by the council, execute a process to accept the advanced placement subject test scores of students who obtain a three (3) or better in any advanced placement course for college credit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 596, § 5; P.L. 1991, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 22; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 34, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 5; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 207, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 155, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 156, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

16-59-4.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 15; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 6, effective June 19, 2014.

16-59-5.
Meetings of board.

The board shall hold regular meetings at least twice in each quarter of each calendar year. All meetings of the board of governors for higher education shall be open to the public, provided that executive sessions may be held as subordinate parts of public meetings only when matters relating to sensitive personnel or collective bargaining are to be heard.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 1, § 19.

16-59-6.
Commissioner of postsecondary education.

The council on postsecondary education, with approval of the board, shall appoint a commissioner of postsecondary education, who shall serve at the pleasure of the council, provided that his or her initial engagement by the council shall be for a period of not more than three (3) years. For the purpose of appointing, retaining, or dismissing a commissioner of postsecondary education, the governor shall serve as an additional voting member of the council. The position of commissioner shall be in the unclassified service of the state and he or she shall serve as the chief executive officer of the council on postsecondary education, the chief administrative officer of the office of postsecondary commissioner, and the executive director of the division of higher education assistance. The commissioner of postsecondary education shall have any duties that are defined in this section and in this title and other additional duties as may be determined by the council, and shall perform any other duties as may be vested in him or her by law. In addition to these duties and general supervision of the office of postsecondary commissioner and the appointment of the several officers and employees of the office, it shall be the duty of the commissioner of postsecondary education:

To develop and implement a systematic program of information gathering, processing, and analysis addressed to every aspect of higher education in the state, especially as that information relates to current and future educational needs.

To prepare a strategic plan for higher education in the state aligned with the goals of the board of education’s strategic plan; to coordinate the goals and objectives of the higher public education sector with the goals of the council on elementary and secondary education and activities of the independent higher education sector where feasible.

To communicate with, and seek the advice of those concerned with, and affected by the board of education’s and council’s determinations.

To implement broad policy as it pertains to the goals and objectives established by the board of education and council on postsecondary education; to promote better coordination between higher public education in the state, independent higher education in the state as provided in subsection (10) of this section, and preK-12 education; to assist in the preparation of the budget for public higher education; and to be responsible, upon direction of the council, for the allocation of appropriations, the acquisition, holding, disposition of property.

To be responsible for the coordination of the various higher educational functions of the state so that maximum efficiency and economy can be achieved.

To assist the board of education in preparation and maintenance of a five-year (5) strategic funding plan for higher education; to assist the council in the preparation and presentation annually to the state budget officer in accordance with §

35-3-4

of a total, public higher educational budget.

To recommend to the council on postsecondary education, after consultation with the presidents, a clear and definitive mission for each college.

To annually recommend to the council on postsecondary education, after consultation with the presidents, the creation, abolition, retention, or consolidation of departments, divisions, programs, and courses of study within the public colleges to eliminate unnecessary duplication in public higher education, to address the future needs of public higher education in the state, and to advance proposals recommended by the presidents of the public colleges pursuant to §§

16-33-2.1

and

16-33.1-2.1

.

To supervise the operations of the office of postsecondary commissioner, including the division of higher education assistance, and any other additional duties and responsibilities that may be assigned by the council.

To perform the duties vested in the council with relation to independent higher educational institutions within the state under the terms of chapter 40 of this title and any other laws that affect independent higher education in the state.

To be responsible for the administration of policies, rules, and regulations of the council on postsecondary education with relation to the entire field of higher education within the state, not specifically granted to any other department, board, or agency and not incompatible with law.

To prepare standard accounting procedures for public higher education and all public colleges.

To carry out the policies and directives of the board of education and the council on postsecondary education through the office of postsecondary commissioner and through utilization of the resources of the public colleges.

To enter into interstate reciprocity agreements regarding the provision of postsecondary distance education; to administer such agreements; to approve or disapprove applications to voluntarily participate in such agreements from postsecondary institutions that have their principal place of business in Rhode Island; and to establish annual fees, with the approval of the council on postsecondary education, for aforesaid applications to participate in an interstate postsecondary distance education reciprocity agreement.

To the extent necessary for participation, and to the extent required and stated in any distance learning reciprocity agreement, to implement procedures to address complaints received from out-of-state students in connection with, or related to, any Rhode Island postsecondary institution, public or private, that has been approved to participate in said reciprocity agreement.

To oversee the processes that the community college of Rhode Island, Rhode Island college, and the university of Rhode Island adopt and execute, pursuant to §§

16-32-2(i)

and

16-59-4(25)

, to accept advanced placement subject test scores of students who obtain a three (3) or better in any advanced placement course for college credit.

To collect data annually related to awarding college credit to students who receive test scores of three (3) or higher on advanced placement courses, including, but not limited to:

The number of students who receive college credit at each public institution of higher learning for obtaining advanced placement test scores of three (3) or higher;

The number of college credits issued by the community college of Rhode Island, Rhode Island college, and the university of Rhode Island due to students’ advanced placement subject test scores of three (3) (“qualified”) or better in any advanced placement course; and

Any other relevant data as determined by the commissioner.

To exercise all powers and duties of the division of higher education assistance as set forth under the terms of chapter 57 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 596, § 5; P.L. 1991, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 54; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 5; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 207, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 6; P.L. 2022, ch. 155, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 156, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

16-59-7.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 13, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 21, effective August 9, 1996.

16-59-7.1.
Permanent status for non-classified employees.

All non-classified employees of the council on postsecondary education who shall have twenty (20) years, not necessarily consecutive, of service credit, these credits having been earned in either the classified, non-classified, or unclassified service or any combination of these, shall be deemed to have acquired full status in their positions as the status is defined by §

36-4-59

; provided that this provision shall not apply to those employees whose base entry date is after August 7, 1996; and provided that this provision shall not apply to faculty employed by the council on postsecondary education nor shall it apply to non-classified employees who have acquired tenure as faculty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 527, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 5.

16-59-7.2.
Longevity payments — Nonclassified employees.

The non-classified employees of the board of governors for higher education, except for faculty employees and except for non-classified employees already receiving longevity increases, shall be entitled to a longevity payment in the amount of five percent (5%) of base salary after ten (10) years of service and increasing to a total of ten percent (10%) of base salary after twenty (20) years of service. The provisions of this section will apply only to employees under the grade of nineteen (19). The longevity payments shall not be included in base salary.

The board of governors is authorized to promulgate regulations implementing the provisions of this section.

Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for employees of the board of governors; provided, however, for employees with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, longevity increases shall cease beginning on July 1, 2011 or beginning upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later. To the extent an employee has previously accrued longevity payments, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the last pay period in June, 2011 shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011, or in the case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the latter of the last pay period in June or the last pay period prior to the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011 or upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 571, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 54; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 8, § 2.

16-59-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 6, effective June 19, 2014.

16-59-9.
Educational budget and appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums it deems necessary for support and maintenance of higher education in the state and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the appropriations or so much of the sums that are necessary for the purposes appropriated, upon the receipt by him or her of proper vouchers as the council on postsecondary education may by rule provide. The council shall receive, review, and adjust the budget for the office of postsecondary commissioner and present the budget as part of the budget for higher education under the requirements of §

35-3-4

.

The office of postsecondary commissioner and the institutions of public higher education shall establish working capital accounts.

Any tuition or fee increase schedules in effect for the institutions of public higher education shall be received by the council on postsecondary education for allocation for the fiscal year for which state appropriations are made to the council by the general assembly; provided that no further increases may be made by the board of education or the council on postsecondary education for the year for which appropriations are made. Except that these provisions shall not apply to the revenues of housing, dining, and other auxiliary facilities at the university of Rhode Island, Rhode Island college, and the community colleges including student fees as described in P.L. 1962, ch. 257 pledged to secure indebtedness issued at any time pursuant to P.L. 1962, ch. 257 as amended.

All housing, dining, and other auxiliary facilities at all public institutions of higher learning shall be self-supporting and no funds shall be appropriated by the general assembly to pay operating expenses, including principal and interest on debt services, and overhead expenses for the facilities, with the exception of the mandatory fees covered by the Rhode Island promise scholarship program as established by §

16-107-3

. Any debt-service costs on general obligation bonds presented to the voters in November 2000 and November 2004 or appropriated funds from the Rhode Island capital plan for the housing auxiliaries at the university of Rhode Island and Rhode Island college shall not be subject to this self-supporting requirement in order to provide funds for the building construction and rehabilitation program. The institutions of public higher education will establish policies and procedures that enhance the opportunity for auxiliary facilities to be self-supporting, including that all faculty provide timely and accurate copies of booklists for required textbooks to the public higher educational institution’s bookstore.

The additional costs to achieve self-supporting status shall be by the implementation of a fee schedule of all housing, dining, and other auxiliary facilities, including but not limited to, operating expenses, principal, and interest on debt services, and overhead expenses.

The board of education is authorized to establish two (2) restricted-receipt accounts for the higher education and industry centers established throughout the state: one to collect lease payments from occupying companies, and fees from room and service rentals, to support the operation and maintenance of the facilities; and one to collect donations to support construction, operations and maintenance. All such revenues shall be deposited to the restricted-receipt accounts.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (d) of this section or any provisions of this title, to the extent necessary to comply with the provisions of any outstanding bonds issued by the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation or outstanding lease certificates of participation, in either case, issued for the benefit of the university of Rhode Island, the community college of Rhode Island, and/or Rhode Island college, to the extent necessary to comply with the provisions of any such bonds or certificates of participation, the general assembly shall annually appropriate any such sums it deems necessary from educational and general revenues (including, but not limited to, tuition) and auxiliary enterprise revenues derived from the university of Rhode Island, the community college of Rhode Island and Rhode Island college, to be allocated by the council on postsecondary education or by the board of trustees of the university of Rhode Island, as appropriate, in accordance with the terms of the contracts with such bondholders or certificate holders.

The board of education is authorized to establish a restricted-receipt account for income generated by the Rhode Island nursing education center through the rental of classrooms, laboratories, or other facilities located on the Providence campus of the nursing education center. All such revenues shall be deposited to the restricted receipt account.

The board of education is authorized to establish a restricted-receipt account for the receipt and expenditure of monies received from IGT Global Solutions Corporation for the purpose of financing scholarships relating to studying science, technology, engineering, or mathematics at an accredited educational institution. This account shall be housed within the budget of the office of the postsecondary commissioner and exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of §

35-4-27

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 245, art. XVI, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 79, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 5, § 7; P.L. 2000, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 54; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 5, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 34, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 3, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 2, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 6; P.L. 2020, ch. 80, art. 1, § 37; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

16-59-9.1.
Incentive fund for excellence — Challenge fund for management and administration improvement — Carry-forward provision.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums as may be necessary to create and maintain an “incentive fund for excellence”, which shall be used by the board of governors to fund program initiatives to improve the quality of the undergraduate education offered by the institutions of public higher education.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums as may be necessary to create and maintain a “challenge fund for management and administration improvement” to be administered by the board of governors. The board shall award grants to the institutions of public higher education on a competitive basis upon presentation of proposals designed to effect projected administrative savings of an amount equal to or more than the amount of the grant requested.

Any amounts remaining at the end of any fiscal year in the funds established under subsection (a) or (b), or any amounts allocated to the institutions under these sections, may be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

The board of governors shall annually report to the general assembly concerning the amounts and specific purposes and the effectiveness of all allocations made from the funds established in subsections (a) and (b).

History of Section.

P.L. 1987 ch. 596, § 4.

16-59-9.2.
Military tuition waiver.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, an applicant who is a member of the armed forces or reserves of the United States and is currently stationed in Rhode Island shall be exempt from paying nonresident tuition at Rhode Island public universities, colleges or community colleges. The council on postsecondary education shall prescribe rules and regulations as may be necessary for the implementation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 411, § 1.

16-59-9.3.
Student Success Act.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the general or public laws:

A student, other than a nonimmigrant alien within the meaning of 8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(15), who meets all of the following requirements shall be exempt from paying nonresident tuition at Rhode Island public universities, colleges, or community colleges, if he or she:

Attended an approved Rhode Island high school for three (3) or more consecutive years;

Continues to reside in the state of Rhode Island;

Has graduated from an approved Rhode Island high school or received a high school equivalency diploma from the state of Rhode Island;

Has filed, or will file, upon matriculation, with the Rhode Island public university, college, or community college of expected attendance, an affidavit stating that:

The student meets the requirements of subsections (1)(i) and (1)(ii) of this section; and

If the student is not a United States citizen and does not have a lawful immigration status, that the student has filed an application for lawful immigration status, or will file the application as soon as the student is eligible to do so. The affidavit shall not require students to reveal their immigration or citizenship status.

Any nonimmigrant foreign national student, who has resided in Rhode Island for three (3) years and has attended a Rhode Island high school for three (3) years, will be eligible to pay the same in-state tuition as any other Rhode Island student.

Identifiable student information obtained pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be confidential to the extent provided by state and federal law (including the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA)). If information obtained pursuant to this section regarding a student’s immigration status is provided to any agency for purposes other than the implementation of this section, the entity providing the information shall promptly notify the student.

The Rhode Island council for postsecondary education shall prescribe rules and regulations as may be necessary for the implementation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 346, § 1, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 365, § 1, effective July 12, 2021.

16-59-10.
Existing academic privileges preserved.

No provision of this chapter shall be construed to impair academic freedom or academic governance at any institution under the jurisdiction of the board of governors, nor to divest any faculty member of the institution of tenure, retirement or other right or benefit to which the member may now be entitled.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3.